Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-403
Commission plan; proposal for adoption; frequency.

If the proposition of adopting the commission plan of government is not adopted at the special election under section 19-402 by a majority vote, the question of adopting it shall not be again submitted in the same city within two years thereafter.

Laws 1911, c. 24, § 3, p. 151;

R.S.1913, § 5290;

C.S.1922, § 4513;

C.S.1929, § 19-403;

R.S.1943, § 19-403;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 13.